Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2381.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) There is hereby established the safe and secure firearm
detection program. The attorney general shall oversee and implement the
safe and secure firearm detection program in accordance with the
requirements of this section and any rules and regulations established by
the attorney general pursuant to this section.
(b) The attorney general shall enter into a contract with a private
vendor for firearm detection software to be used by a public entity or
accredited nonpublic school. Such software shall:
(1) Detect and alert building personnel and first responders regarding
the presence of visible, unholstered firearms on the public entity or
accredited nonpublic school property;
(2) be fully designated as qualified anti-terrorism technology under
the federal SAFETY act, 6 U.S.C. § 441 et seq.;
(3) integrate with a building's security camera infrastructure;
(4) be directly managed by the contracted vendor through a
constantly monitored operations center that is staffed by highly trained
analysts who can rapidly communicate possible threats to law enforcement
and appropriate building personnel; and
(5) be developed in the United States without the use of any third-
party or open-source data.
(c) Any public entity or accredited nonpublic school may apply to the
attorney general for authorization to use the firearm detection software.
The application shall be in such form and manner as the attorney general
requires and submitted at a time determined and specified by the attorney
general. Each application submitted by a public entity or accredited
nonpublic school shall specify the buildings in which such public entity or
accredited nonpublic school intends to use the firearm detection software.
(d) There is hereby established in the state treasury the safe and

HB 2381 2
secure firearm detection fund, which shall be administered by the attorney
general. All expenditures from such fund shall be for implementing the
provisions of this section. All expenditures from such fund shall be made
in accordance with appropriation acts upon warrants of the director of
accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the attorney
general or the attorney general's designee.
(e) On July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as moneys are available, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer $20,000,000 from the state
general fund to the safe and secure firearm detection fund.
(f) The attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations to
effectuate the provisions of this section.
(g) Annually, on or before the first day of the regular session of the
legislature commencing in 2026, the attorney general shall prepare and
submit a report summarizing the safe and secure firearm detection
program for public entities and accredited nonpublic schools to the house
of representatives standing committees on appropriations and education
and the senate standing committees on ways and means and education.
(h) As used in this section:
(1) "Public entity" means the state or any political or taxing
subdivision of the state or any office, agency or instrumentality thereof, or
any other entity receiving or expending and supported in whole or in part
by public funds appropriated by the state or public funds of any political or
taxing subdivision of the state and a medical care facility.
(2) "Medical care facility" means a hospital, ambulatory surgical
center or recuperation center. "Medical care facility" does not include a
hospice that is certified to participate in the medicare program under 42
C.F.R. § 418.1 et seq. and that provides services only to hospice patients.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.